Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.335

Investments—Qualified thrift investments.

A mutual savings bank may invest in loans or securities that are qualified thrift investments for a savings association subject to the limits specified in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1467a(m).

[ 1999 c 14 s 27.]